Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-406
Formation; election; form of ballot.

Such election shall be by ballot which shall be signed by the voter, and shall have thereon a list of the land and lots which the voter claims the right to vote. The ballot shall be in the following form, and ballots at annual elections shall be in similar form.

List of Property on Which Vote is Based.

Number of

Section
Town or
Range or
Acres or

Description
or Lot
Block
City
Lots

............
........
........
........
........

............
........
........
........
........

............
........
........
........
........

Total number of votes claimed on same ..............

Nature of title
to or interest in above ............

For formation
of district ..........................

........
Yes

........
No

Vote for
..............

For board of directors if
proposed
Number of

district is formed.
Votes

........................................
............

........................................
............

........................................
............

........................................
............

........................................
............

........................................
............

.....................................

Signature of Voter

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 6, p. 476;

R.S.1913, § 1871;

C.S.1922, § 1818;

C.S.1929, § 31-506;

R.S.1943, § 31-406.

Mere fact that voter writes on the ballot the nature of the instrument by which he acquired title does not invalidate the ballot. Chicago & N. W. Ry. Co. v. Payne Creek Drainage Dist., 148 Neb. 139, 26 N.W.2d 607 (1947).